Arkansas, session 2025, SB477.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 5, Chapter 36, Subchapter 1, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
5-36-127. Theft of Equipment Rental Services.
(a) As used in this section, "equipment rental service" means the
commercial service of providing equipment for rent or lease.
(b) A person commits the offense of theft of equipment rental services
if he or she knowingly:
(1) After the expiration of a lease or rental period, exercises
unauthorized control or otherwise deprives the lessor or renter of equipment
that is leased, rented, or entrusted to the person; or
(2) Causes damage to equipment that is leased, rented, or
entrusted to the person such that the equipment is not in a condition to be
provided for rent or lease without repair.
(c) It is a defense to prosecution under this section that the person
compensated the lessor or renter of the equipment for:
(1) The value of the equipment rental service for the time
between the expiration of the lease or rental period and the return of the
equipment to the lessor or renter; and
*CEB111*
02/19/2025 11:29:16 AM CEB111

SB477
(2) The value of any damage to the equipment.
(d) A violation of this section is a:
(1) Class B felony if the value of the equipment rental service
for the time between the expiration of the lease or rental period and the
return of the equipment, the damage to the equipment, or both, is twenty-five
thousand dollars ($25,000) or more;
(2) Class C felony if the value of the equipment rental service
for the time between the expiration of the lease or rental period and the
return of the equipment, the damage to the equipment, or both, is less than
twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) but more than five thousand dollars
($5,000);
(3) Class D felony if the value of the equipment rental service
for the time between the expiration of the lease or rental period and the
return of the equipment, the damage to the equipment, or both, is five
thousand dollars ($5,000) or less but more than one thousand dollars
($1,000);
(4) Class A misdemeanor if the value of the equipment rental
service for the time between the expiration of the lease or rental period and
the return of the equipment, the damage to the equipment, or both, is one
thousand dollars ($1,000) or less.
(e) In addition to any other sentence authorized by law, the court
shall order a person convicted of theft of rental services to pay restitution
to the lessor or renter of the equipment for the value of the equipment
rental service for the time between the expiration of the lease or rental
period and the return of the equipment and any damage to the equipment.











02/19/2025 11:29:16 AM CEB111